Utah statutes.
42-2-6.   Change in persons transacting business under assumed name.
An amended certificate shall be filed with the Division of Corporations and
Commercial Code not later than 30 days after any change in the person or
persons owning, carrying on, conducting, or transacting such business or a
change in the registered agent or office of the business or in any information
required to be filed with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code
under this act.
